test/src/morphology/adj-ak.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that end on -k. From lexicon BASSTEL,RITSOK, NAMÁK ,MUTTÁK, GÅBDDÅK, ALLAK, AGAdj, BASSTEL, STUORAK and SJÆVNNJAT

Tests:

  Adjective - tjårvak: # AGAdj
    tjårvak+A+Attr: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Nom: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Ine: tjårvagin
    tjårvak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gielak: # AGAdj
    gielak+A+Attr: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Nom: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Acc: gielagav 
    gielak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    gielak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gilduk: # AGAdj
    gilduk+A+Attr: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Nom: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Com: gildugijn 
    gilduk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gildugabbo
    gilduk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gildugamos

  Adjective - vuonnak: # AGAdj
    vuonnak+A+Attr: vuonnak
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Nom: vuonnak
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Gen: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Acc: vuonnagav
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ill: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ine: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ela: vuonnagis
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Com: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Nom: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Gen: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Acc: vuonnagijt
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ill: vuonnagijda
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ine: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ela: vuonnagijs
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Com: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Ess: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vuonnagabbo
    vuonnak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vuonnagamos

  Adjective - gassak: # ALLAK
    gassak+A+Attr: gassa 
    gassak+A+Sg+Nom: gassak 
    gassak+A+Sg+Gen: gassaga 
    gassak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gasep
    gassak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gasemus

  Adjective - allak: # ALLAK
    allak+A+Attr: alla 
    allak+A+Sg+Nom: allak 
    allak+A+Sg+Acc: allagav 
    allak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: alep
    allak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: alemus

  Adjective - gåbddåk: # GÅBDDÅK
    gåbddåk+A+Attr: gåbddå 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom: gåbddåk 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc: gåbddågav 
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gåbdep
    gåbddåk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gåbdemus

  Adjective - girjak: # MUTTÁK
    girjak+A+Attr: girjak 
    girjak+A+Sg+Nom: girjak 
    girjak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: girjagabbo
    girjak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: girjagamos

  Adjective - guoktalåkvidájagák: # NAMÁK
    guoktalåkvidájagák+A+Attr: guoktalåkvidájagák 
    guoktalåkvidájagák+A+Sg+Nom: guoktalåkvidájagák
    guoktalåkvidájagák+A+Sg+Acc: guoktalåkvidájagágav
    guoktalåkvidájagák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    guoktalåkvidájagák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - rihtsok: # RIHTSOK
    rihtsok+A+Attr: rihtso 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsok 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Com: rihtsogijn 
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rihtsogabbo
    rihtsok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rihtsogamos

  Adjective - roahkok: # BASSTEL
    roahkok+A+Attr: roahkogis 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Nom: roahkok 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Ine: roahkogin 
    roahkok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: roahkogabbo
    roahkok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: roahkogamos

  Adjective - skárbak: # BASSTEL
    skárbak+A+Attr: skárbbis 
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: skárbak 
    skárbak+A+Sg+Acc: skárbagav 
    skárbak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: skárbagabbo
    skárbak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: skárbagamos

  Adjective - smávuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    smávuk+A+Attr: [] 
    smávuk+A+Sg+Nom: smávuk 
    smávuk+A+Sg+Gen: smávuga 
    smávuk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: smávugabbo
    smávuk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: smávugamos
    
  Adjective - stuorak: # STUORAK
    skárbak+A+Attr: [stuor, stuorra] 
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: stuorak 
    skárbak+A+Sg+Acc: stuoragav 
    skárbak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stuoráp
    skárbak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stuorámus
